Hawaii statutes.
[§398-25] Civil action. (a) If an
employer fails or neglects to comply with the:

(1) Final order of the department from which no
appeal has been taken as provided by this chapter; or

(2) Final decision of the hearings officer,

the department or the affected employee may apply to
any court of competent jurisdiction to enforce the provisions of the final
order or decision and for any other appropriate relief. In any proceeding to
enforce the provisions of the final order or decision, the department or the
affected employee need only file with the court proof that a certified copy of
the final order or decision was served. In the case of the final decision,
proof that the notice of hearing was given also must be filed with the court.

(b) Any action to enforce this chapter, or to
recover damages or equitable relief prescribed by this chapter, may be
maintained in any court of competent jurisdiction by any one or more employees
for and on behalf of the employee or employees, or the employee or employees may
designate an agent or representative to maintain the action.

(c) In any action brought under this chapter,
the court shall allow, in addition to any judgment awarded to the plaintiff,
costs of action, including fees of any nature, and reasonable attorney's fees
to be paid by the defendant. [L 1995, c 154, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next